Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB808.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 91A.400 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) [, ]"Authorized city" means all home rule class cities; and
(b) "Authorized city" does not include urban-county governments, consolidated
local governments, charter county governments, or unified local
governments[ a city on the registry maintained by the Department for Local
Government under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) On or before January 1, 2015, the Department for Local Government shall create
and maintain a registry of cities that, as of January 1, 2014, were classified as cities
of the fourth or fifth class. The Department for Local Government shall make the
information included on the registry available to the public by publishing it on its
Web site].
(2)[(3)] In addition to the three percent (3%) transient room tax authorized by KRS
91A.390(1)(b), the [city ]legislative body in an authorized city may levy an
additional restaurant tax not to exceed three percent (3%) of the retail sales by all
restaurants doing business in the city.[ All moneys collected from the tax authorized
by this section shall be turned over to the tourist and convention commission
established in that city as provided by KRS 91A.345 to 91A.394.]
Section 2. KRS 67.938 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax structure, tax rates, and level of services in effect in the county and in each
of the participating cities upon the adoption of a unified local government shall
remain in effect after the adoption of the unified local government and shall remain
the same until changed by the newly elected unified local government legislative
council.
(2) In order to maintain the tax structure, tax rates, or level of services in the areas of
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/1/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2404
the unified local government formerly comprising incorporated cities, the unified
local government council may provide, in a manner described in this section, for
taxes and services within the formerly incorporated cities that are different from the
taxes and services which are applicable in the remainder of the unified local
government. [If a unified local government is formed that contains a participating
city with a restaurant tax imposed pursuant to KRS 91A.400, the restaurant tax may
be retained by the unified local government in the area of the participating city.]
(3) Any difference in the ad valorem tax rate on the class of property which includes
the surface of the land in the portion of the county formerly comprising the
incorporated cities, and the surface of the land in the portion of the county other
than that formerly comprising the incorporated cities, may be imposed directly by
the unified local government legislative council. Any change in these ad valorem
tax rates shall comply with KRS 68.245, 132.010, 132.017, and 132.027 and shall
be used for services as provided by KRS 82.085.
(4) All delinquent taxes of a participating city in a unified local government shall be
filed with the county clerk and shall be known as certificates of delinquency or
personal property certificates of delinquency and shall be governed by the
procedures set out in KRS Chapter 134, except that certificates of delinquency and
personal property certificates of delinquency on former city tax bills may be paid or
purchased directly from the clerk under KRS 134.126 and 134.127.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/1/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed